Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 3. Plans, Specifications and Contracts

§ 15-6-301.
General requirements; cooperation with federal government.

Immediately upon the passage of the ordinance, the city engineer shall prepare and file with the city clerk, plans and specifications which shall show in detail the work to be done, the quantities of material to be handled and the estimated cost of the improvements. The governing body shall approve the plans and specifications by motion or resolution.

The improvements may be made under contracts, or as a part of a contract, publicly let by the state or any agency thereof, or by the city or town in the manner provided in this section and W.S.

15-6-302

, or the city or town may make the improvements with its own equipment, labor and materials, without contract, or any combination of methods may be followed. If the improvements are to be made by municipal contracts, the city clerk shall call for bids by publishing a notice in at least one (1) issue of some newspaper published within the city or town or within the county in which the city or town is located and in such other papers as the governing body may provide in the ordinance.

The improvements may be made with the cooperation and assistance of the United States government or any agency or subdivision thereof, and the city or town may take advantage of any offer from any source to complete the improvements on a division of expense or responsibility.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 343; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-343; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Sewer assessments and bonds issued in substantial compliance

with essential provisions of law authorizing construction of sewers by first class cities were valid though levied and issued pursuant to later act respecting improvements by all municipalities. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-302.
Call for bids; contents; procedure for awarding and executing contracts.

The notice and call for bids as provided in W.S.

15-6-301

shall contain in substance the following:

The streets or parts thereof to be improved if the improvements are to be street improvements;

The general kind of improvement proposed to be made and whether it is to be maintained by the contractor for a specified period, but in no event for more than five (5) years;

The time within which bids will be received and the place where they shall be filed;

That a certified or cashier’s check or bid bond in the sum of five percent (5%) of the amount of the bid must be filed with the bid, to be forfeited to the city or town as liquidated damages if the bidder is awarded the contract and fails to enter into a contract with the city or town within five (5) days from the date of his notification;

The successful bidder shall perform the work and furnish a bond guaranteeing the faithful performance of the work and a maintenance bond, if required by the governing body, which shall be furnished at the time of signing the contract. The guarantee and maintenance bond may be a single instrument.

The bids shall be opened by the governing body and the contract or contracts shall be awarded to the bidder or bidders who in its opinion are the lowest and best responsible bidders. The governing body may reject any and all bids.

Upon the letting of the contract or contracts to the successful bidders, the governing body, by motion or resolution, shall order the mayor or clerk, or some other officer of the city or town, to execute a written contract or contracts on behalf of the city or town with the successful bidders. The refusal of any official or officer of the city or town to execute the written contract or contracts does not affect the validity of the contract or contracts and the governing body may order some other city or town official or officer or one (1) of its members to execute the written agreement or agreements in place of the official or officer refusing to do so.

All bids and contracts for capital construction projects shall be in accord with the Wyoming contractor preference laws of title 16, chapter 6.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 344; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-344; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to public works and contractor's bond, see §§

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (d).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public contracts: low bidder's monetary relief against state or local agency for nonaward of contract, 65 ALR4th 93.